California, session 20252026, AB2439.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4755 is added to the Civil Code, to read:4755. Except for restrictions to enforce public health and safety standards and requirements imposed by local authorities, the governing documents shall not impose restrictions on a member’s use of public roads. streets.SEC. 2. Section 5655 of the Civil Code is amended to read:5655. (a) Any payments made by the owner of a separate interest toward a debt described in subdivision (a) of Section 5650 shall first be applied to the assessments owed, and, only after the assessments owed are paid in full shall the payments be applied to the fees and costs of collection, attorney’s fees, late charges, or interest.(b) When an owner makes a payment, the owner may request a receipt and the association shall provide it. The receipt shall indicate the date of payment and the person who received it.(c) The association shall provide a mailing address for overnight payment of assessments. The address shall be provided in the annual policy statement.(d) If the person or entity authorized to receive payments of assessment on behalf of the association changes, the association shall notify members through individual notice by one of the following methods within 60 days of the change:(1) Electronic delivery for any member who has opted into that method of delivery for receiving general notices from the association.(2) First-class mail, evidenced by a certificate of mailing, for any member who has not opted into electronic delivery of notices from the association.(e) (1) If after sending an individual notice pursuant to subdivision (d), a member has failed to pay two consecutive assessment payments, the association shall send a second notice by certified mail with return receipt requested.(2) If the association sent the individual notice pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), and the member affirmatively responded to the notice, then the association is not required to send a second notice pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subdivision.(f) The association shall maintain records confirming that individual notices were distributed, pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e). If a member requests proof of the delivery, the association shall provide it at no charge to the member.(g) An association shall also make a reasonable effort to post a physical copy of the notice distributed pursuant to subdivision (d) in the association’s common areas.SEC. 3. Section 5690 of the Civil Code is amended to read:5690. (a) An association that fails to comply with the procedures set forth in this article shall, prior to recording a lien, recommence the required notice process. Any costs associated with recommencing the notice process shall be borne by the association and not by the owner of a separate interest.(b) If an association fails to comply with the procedures set forth in this article, the board association shall be liable to the owner of the separate interest for both of the following:(1)The the reconveyance fee and any costs of the owner of the separate interest associated with the association’s failure to comply with the procedures set forth in this article.(2)A (c) (1) If the association fails to comply with the procedures set forth in this article, and the failure is the third failure to comply with the procedures set forth in this article within a five-year period, the board shall be liable to the owner of the separate interest for a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000).(2) If a civil penalty is imposed pursuant to paragraph (1), the association shall notify members by general notice of the board’s failure to comply with the procedures set forth in this article.